Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205.07, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Date of election. The municipal general election in each city shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in every even-numbered year. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary and subject to the provisions of this section, the governing body of a city new text begin of the first class new text end may, by ordinance passed at a regular meeting held at least 180 calendar days before the first day to file for candidacy in the next municipal election, decide to hold the election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in either an even- or odd-numbered year. A city new text begin of the first class new text end may hold elections in either the even-numbered year or the odd-numbered year, but not both. When a citynew text begin of the first classnew text end changes its elections from one year to another, and does not provide for the expiration of terms by ordinance, the term of an incumbent expiring at a time when no municipal election is held in the months immediately prior to expiration is extended until the date for taking office following the next scheduled municipal election. If the change results in having three council members to be elected at a succeeding election, the two individuals receiving the highest vote shall serve for terms of four years and the individual receiving the third highest number of votes shall serve for a term of two years. To provide an orderly transition to the odd or even year election plan, the governing body of the city may adopt supplementary ordinances regulating initial elections and officers to be chosen at the elections and shortening or lengthening the terms of incumbents and those elected at the initial election. The term of office for the mayor may be either two or four years. The term of office of council members is four years. Whenever the time of the municipal election new text begin in a city of the first class new text end is changed, the city clerk immediately shall notify in writing the county auditor and secretary of state of the change of date. Thereafter the municipal general election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered or even-numbered year until the ordinance is revoked and notification of the change is made. A municipal general election scheduled to be held in an odd-numbered year may be postponed for inclement weather as provided in section 205.105. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Effect of ordinance; referendum. An ordinance changing the year of the municipal election new text begin in a city of the first class new text end is effective 240 days after passage and publication or at a later date fixed in the ordinance. Within 180 days after passage and publication of the ordinance, a petition requesting a referendum on the ordinance may be filed with the city clerk. The petition shall be signed by eligible voters equal in number to ten percent of the total number of votes cast in the city at the last municipal general election. If the requisite petition is filed within the prescribed period, the ordinance shall not become effective until it is approved by a majority of the voters voting on the question at a general or special election held on a date authorized by section 205.10, subdivision 3a. If the petition is filed, the governing body may reconsider its action in adopting the ordinance. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205.075, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Alternate date. A town may, by resolution or ordinance, designate the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of deleted text begin either thedeleted text end new text begin annew text end even-numbered deleted text begin or the odd-numbereddeleted text end year as the date of the town general election. Town supervisors elected at a November town general election shall serve four-year terms. The ordinance or resolution changing the date of the town general election must include a plan to shorten or lengthen the terms of office to provide an orderly transition to the November election schedule. The ordinance or resolution changing the date of the town general election may be proposed by the town board or by a resolution of the electors adopted at the annual town meeting and is effective upon an affirmative vote of the electors at the next town general election. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Resolution requiring primary in certain circumstances. The school board of a school district may, by resolution adopted by April 15 of deleted text begin anydeleted text end new text begin an even-numberednew text end year, decide to choose nominees for school board by a primary as provided in this section. The resolution, when adopted, is effective for all ensuing elections of board members in that school district until it is revoked. If the board decides to choose nominees by primary and if there are more than two candidates for a specified school board position or more than twice as many school board candidates as there are at-large school board positions available, the school district must hold a primary. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Date. The school district primary must be held on the second Tuesday in August in the year when the school district general election is held. The clerk shall give notice of the primary in the manner provided in section 205A.07. deleted text begin The date of a school district primary held in an odd-numbered year may be postponed for inclement weather as provided in section 205A.055.deleted text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. School district general election. The general election in each school district must be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of deleted text begin either the odd-numbered or thedeleted text end new text begin annew text end even-numbered year. deleted text begin A general election held in an odd-numbered year may be postponed for inclement weather as provided in section 205A.055.deleted text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.055, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. This section applies to a deleted text begin primary,deleted text end specialdeleted text begin , or generaldeleted text end election held in a school district that is not held in conjunction with a state or federal election. Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 205A.04, subdivision 3, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; TRANSITION.new text end new text begin This act is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to elections conducted on or after January 1, 2026. No later than January 1, 2026, the governing body of an affected city, town, or school district must adopt a plan for an orderly transition to an even-numbered year election as required by this act. The plan must be adopted by ordinance in the case of a city, or by ordinance or resolution in the case of a town or school district. The terms of office for elected officers of the city, town, or school district may be lengthened or shortened by one year as part of the transition plan. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-02372 205A.04 GENERAL ELECTION. Subd. 3. Change in year of general election. The school board may, by resolution, change the year in which the school district general election will be held. The resolution must be approved no later than four weeks before the first day to file affidavits of candidacy for the general election. A plan for the orderly transition to the new election year must be included in the resolution. The terms of school board members may be lengthened or shortened by one year as a part of the transition process.